Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.130

Penalty—License impairment.

The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a license if the applicant or holder violates any provision of this chapter or any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1994 c 92 s 272; 1989 c 212 s 13.]